dictsource/nl_rules
// translation rules for Dutch
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Suffix rule: SUFX_E  eg. S2e  means double the vowel before the final consonant

.L01  g k


.group a
             a            a:
             a (CK        A
             a (x         A
             aa           a:
             aai          a:j
             ae           a:
             au           VU
             auw          VU
             ay           a:j

        @@C) a (_         =a:
          _) aan (@P3     'a:n
          @) aar (_S3    a:r
          @) aard (_S4   a:rt
             aa (rd_      'a:
             aa (C_       'a:
          z) aa (m_       a:
          t) a (bleau     a:
          @) abel (_      'a:b@l
          @) abele (_     'a:b@l@
          m) ach (in      %a:S
          _) af (C@P2     'Af
          _) affich       %AfiS
             age (_N      'a:Z@
             ages (_S1    s
             age (_$w_alt a:Q@
             aille (_     'Aj@
             ailles (_    'Aj@s
           m) ail         e:Il
          _) ai (mabel    E
             aire (_      'E:r@
             air (_       'Er
          d) ai (sy       e:
          @) agne (_      'An^@
          @) ant (_       'Ant
          @) ant (e_      'Ant
          @) ant (en_     'Ant
          @) ant (er_     'Ant
             aris (_      'a:rIs
             arissen (_   'a:rIs@n
             a (tor_      'a:

          @) a (de_       'a:
          @) a (ta_       'a:
           b)a (by          e:


.group b
             b            b     // auto-devoice at end-of-word
          b) b
             bs (_N       ps

             baan         ba:n
          &) baar (_S4    =ba:r
          &) bare (_S4    =ba:r@
          _) bij (C@P3    b'EI
             bij (zond    b%i
          _) binnen (P6   b'In@n
          _) boven (P5    b'o:v@n
          _) brand        br'And
          _) buiten (P6   b'Wyt@n
          _) buurt (@@P5  b'yrt   // buurtbewoner

         _o) b (stak      p


.group be
          _) be (@P2      b@
          _) bee (+       be:
          _) be (CjeK     bE
          _) be (C%       bE
          _) be (CCe_     bE
          _) be (CCen_    bE
          _) be (Cer_     be:
          _) be (cC       bE
          _) be (del      be:
          _) bei (de      bEI
          _) beie (r      bEi@
          _) bei (tel     bEI
             be (lg       bE
          _) be (ngel     bE
          _) be (ren      bI:
          _) be (rm       bE
          _) be (stia     bE
          _) be (ter      be:
          _) be (ven_     be:
          _) bever        be:v@r
          _) be (zem      be:
          _) be (zig      be:
          _) beu          bY:


.group c
             c (e         s
             c (i         s
             c (y         s
             c            k
             ci (a        S
          @) ci (eel      S
          @) ci (eus      S
          @) ci (euz      S
          @) ci (ë        S
             ci (o        S
             ck           k
             coach        ko:tS

          _) congres      kOnQr'Es
             co (ncert    k%O


.group ch
             ch           x
          _) ch           S
          _) ch (ador     tS
          _) ch (ao       x
          _) chang (e     SA~Z
          _) chaperon     S,Ap@rO~n
          _) charg (@     SArZ
          _) ch (ari      x
          _) ch (arter    tS
          _) chau (ffe    S%o:
          _) chau (vin    S,o:
             ch (é        S
          &) che (_       =S
          _) ch (emi      x
          _) cheque       SEk
          _) cherry       tSEri
          _) chi (cane    S%i
          _) ch (ip       tS
          _) ch (lo       x
          _) ch (ole      x
          _) cho (que     SO
          _) ch (or       x
          _) ch (r        x
       blan) ch           S
        bro) ch (e        S
        bro) ch (u        S
       brun) ch           S
       deta) ch           S
        mar) ch           S
        _po) ch (e        S
      revan) ch (e        S


.group d
             d            d     // auto-devoice at end-of-word
          d) d
             dt           t
             ds (_N       ts
             d (st        t
//          _) de (CC@P2      d@  // Used a lot in family names
          _) de (geen     d@    // degene, degenen
          _) de (zelf     d@
          _) dj           dZ
             dj           tj


.group e
             e            e#  // [e:] but change to [@] in unstressed syllables
          X) e            e:  // first syllable in a word

             e (_         @
             e (CK        E
             e (x         E
             e (r         I:
             eï (+        @_I
             ei (+        EI
             ee (r        I:
             ee           e:
             eeuw         eU
             eu           Y:

         &C) e (_S1qd     @
        KAC) e (_S1e      @   // remove 'e' and double the vowel
        KAj) e (_S1       @
         el) e (_+S1qd    @
         er) e (_+S1qd    @
         ig) e (_+S1qd    @

             ea (_        'e:a:
             eau          o: //words with French origin
          @) ee (_        'e:
          @) ee (X_       'e:
          @) ee (r_       'I
          @) ee (rt_      'I
          @) ee (rd_      'I
          @) ee (rde_     'I
          @) ee (rden_    'I
          @) e (rende_    'I
          @) e (renden_   'I
         it) eit (_       'EIt
          @) el (_        'El
          &) eld (_       @ld
          &) ele (_       'e:l@

          &) el (_$p_alt   =@l
          &) el (e_$p_alt  =@l
          &) el (en_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (t_$p_alt  =@l
          &) el (de_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (den_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (end_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (ing_$p_alt =@l
          &) el (ingen_$p_alt =@l

          @) elen (_      'e:l@n
          &) elijks       @l@ks
          &) em (_        @m
          &) e (ment      @
          &) e (nissen_   @

          &) en (_S2qd    @n
        KAC) en (_S2e     @n   // flag 'e' means double the previous vowel
        KAj) en (_S2      @n
        and) en (_S2      @n
         el) en (_+S2qd   @n
         er) en (_+S2qd   @n

          &) en (e_$p_altS3  =@n@
          &) en (en_$p_altS4 =@n@n
          &) en (t_$p_altS3  =@nt

          &) ens (_S3q    @ns
         ll) en (_S3      @n
          &) end (_       @nd
          &) ende (_S1    @
          &) enden (_S2   @n
             eden         e:d@n
          @) ent (_       'Ent
          @) ent (e_      'Ent
          @) ent (en_     'Ent
          @) ent (er_     'Ent
          @) ent (ere_    'Ent
          @) ent (st_     'Ent
          @) ent (ste_    'Ent
         ag) ent          'Ent
         @j) es (_        @s
          @) es (_S2qd    'Es   // double the previous vowel
        KAC) es (_S2e     @s
          @) essen (_S5qd 'Es@n
          @) eres (_S4qd  @r'Es
          @) eressen (_S7sq @r'Es@n
          @) etten (_S3   @n 
          @) es    (_$p_alt @s  // for wors which end on [@] with multiple on 's'.

             eau (_       'o:
             euille       @'y
             eum (_$w_alt 'e:8m
       @mus) eum (_       ,e:8m  // compounds
          @) eur (_       'Y:r

          &) e (nB@       E2
         _p) e (nibel     e:
         id) e (nt        E
       pres) e (nt        E

          i) eus (_       'Y:s
          i) euze (_      'Y:z@
          i) euzer (_     'Y:z@r
          i) euzere (_    'Y:z@r@
          i) eust (_      'Y:st
          i) euste (_     'Y:st@

       proc) e (du        e:
          s) e (cuur      @   // secure
          s) e (cond      @
          c) e (ntrum     E   // not @
          _) expositie    Ekspo:z'itsi
             e (rtsD      E

.group er
          @) er (ing_     'I:r
          @) er (ingen_   'I:r
          &) er (_$p_alt   =@r
          &) er (e_$p_alt  =@r
          &) er (en_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (t_$p_alt  =@r
          &) er (d_$p_alt  =@r
          &) er (de_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (den_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (end_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (ende_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (ing_$p_alt =@r
          &) er (ingen_$p_alt =@r
          _) er (@P2      Er
          &) er (_        @r
          &) ere (_       @r@
          &) er (en_$p_alt @r     // where 'eren' is not a verb ending
             eren (_      'I:r@n

             erie (_      @r'i
             er (ij_      @r
        tol) er (abel     @r
        mis) er (abel     @r
          _) erger        ErQ@r  // ergeren
          &) era (_       @ra:
          @) er (aar_     @r
          &) er (C@       E2r


.group f
             f            f
          f) f


.group g
             g            Q    // ph_dutch changes to [x] before unvoiced, NULL after [x]
             gg           Q
          s) g            x

          _) ge (@P2      Q@
             ge (bied     Q@
          _) gee          Qe:
             gener (aal   Q,e:n@r
          _) gelijk       Q@lEIk
          _) ge (rC       QE
          _) geu          QY:
          _) ge (ven      Qe:
          _) ge (ver      Qe:
             ge (val      Q@
          _) ge (ving     Qe:

             ge (sprek    Q@  // in compounds

          @) gi (eus      Z
          @) gi (euz      Z
       reli) gi (eu       Qij


.group h
             h            h
          C) h (K

          _) her (@P3     hEr
          _) her (en      hI:r
          _) herinn       h%ErIn   // herinneren
          _) hersen       h'Ers@n
          &) heid (_S4    hEIt


.group i
             i            i
             ij (+        EI
             i (CK        I
             i (x         I
             ie           i
             ieuw         iw
             iee          ie:

          d) ie (_        'i
          g) ie (_        'i
          m) ie (_        'i
          p) ie (_        'i
             ieus (_      ij'Y:s
             ieuze (_     ij'Y:z@
             ieuzer (_    ij'Y:z@r
             ieuzere (_   ij'Y:z@r@
             ieust (_     ij'Y:st
             ieuste (_    ij'Y:st@
          @) ibel (_      'ib@l
          @) ibele (_     'ib@l@
          &) ica (_       =ika:
          &) ici (_       =isi
          &) ico (_       =iko:
          &) icus (_      =ik8s
             i (che_      i
             ie (X        'i
             ie (Ce_      'i
             ie (Cen_     'i
             ie (Cer_     'i
             ie (Cere_    'i
             ie (Cste_    'i
             ie (CjeX_    'i
             ie (CtjeX_   'i
             ie (ren_     'i
             ie (rd_      'i
          @) ig (_S2dq    =@x
          @) ige (_S3dq   =@Q@
          @) igen (_      =@Q@n
          @) iger (_      =@Q@r
          @) igere (_     =@Q@r@
          @) igst (_      =@Qst
          @) igste (_     =@Qst@
             ij (_        'EI
             ij (e_       'EI
          @) ij (n_       'EI
             ij (tjeX     'EI
             ij (en       'EI
          &) ika (_       =ika:
          &) iko (_       =iko:
          _) in (C@P2     'In
//        _) in (gP2      'In
             io (nage     iO
          @) isch (_      =is
          @) ische (_     =is@
          @) isme (_      'Ism@
          @) ist (_       'Ist
          @) isten (_     'Ist@n
_) inn (@P2 'I    // ?? inneren

.group j
             j            j
             jou (rna     Zu


.group k
             k            k
          k) k

         _) kale (nde     ka:l'E
            kokkerel      kOk@r'El 
         _) koning        k'o:nIN  // in compounds
         _) koningin      ko:nIQ'In
